Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 7. Council Form of Government

§ 21-7-1.
Adoption of council form by certain municipalities authorized.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this title any municipality in this state having a population, according to the 1940 official federal census exceeding 8,000, but not exceeding 9,600, and operating under “code charter” as defined by chapter 3 of this title, may as hereinafter set forth, change its form of government to a plan of government hereby designated as the “council form” in order to place in the council of any municipality, operating under such form, full and complete executive and legislative powers over its entire municipal affairs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 1.

§ 21-7-3.
Applicability of “code charter” provisions.

All of the provisions of law applicable to municipalities operating under “code charter” as aforesaid, which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, shall apply fully to the form of government to be established hereunder. However, such cities coming under the council form shall not be included in those classes of cities set forth in Section 21-29-151, unless and until the council shall have adopted a resolution setting forth their intention to come under Sections 21-29-101 through 21-29-151. All provisions of law vesting rights, privileges and powers in and charging with duties the mayor and/or board of aldermen are hereby specifically vested in the council of municipalities which shall operate under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.7-02, 3825.7-09; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, §§ 2, 9.

§ 21-7-5.
Procedure for adoption or abandonment of plan.

The manner in which any municipality, within the class provided in Section 21-7-1 may change its form of government to the plan authorized herein, shall be as follows:

One or more petitions, similar in form and substance, addressed to the mayor praying that an election be held to determine whether or not such city shall abandon its existing form of government and become organized under a council form of government, signed by at least twenty per centum of the qualified electors of such city, shall be filed with the city clerk, who shall deal with the same as required with reference to other petitions.

If on the delivery of such petition to the mayor, it shall appear that such petition or petitions have not been signed by the required number of qualified electors of such city, the mayor shall at once certify such fact and immediately return such petition or petitions to the person or persons presenting the same, who may thereafter procure additional signers thereto and again file such petition or petitions with the city clerk, as above provided, as an original petition.

If it shall appear at any time from the certificate of the city clerk that said petition or petitions have been signed by the requisite number of qualified electors of said city, the mayor shall immediately refer the same to the board of aldermen. If it shall appear that said petition or petitions are in proper form and have been sufficiently signed by the qualified electors of such city, they shall, within thirty days, order, and provide, for the holding of a special election in such city, to be held, not less than thirty, nor more than sixty days, from the date of making such order, notice of which election shall be given, and the same shall be held and conducted as other elections in such city. At such special election the propositions to be voted for shall be: “FOR THE COUNCIL FORM OF GOVERNMENT” and “FOR THE PRESENT FORM OF GOVERNMENT,” which propositions shall be printed on the official ballot at such election. As soon as the return of such election shall have been certified by the persons holding the same, the board of aldermen shall at their next regular meeting, consider the same, and if a majority of the votes cast at such election, are in favor of the council form of government, then they shall enter an order providing for the election of a mayor, a vice-mayor and five other councilmen provided for under Section 21-7-7, at an election to be held on the second Tuesday in December next before the expiration of the terms of the municipal officers then holding office. Thereupon the said petition or petitions, and all proceedings had thereon, including an order of the mayor and board of aldermen that the form of government will be changed on the first Monday of January following the expiration of their term of office, shall be recorded in the ordinance book of such city, which record shall be evidence of all the matters and things therein contained. The mayor of such city shall immediately certify to the secretary of state that such city by special election has adopted the system of government provided for herein, which certificate shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose by the secretary of state. In case it shall appear by said election returns that a majority of the votes cast at such election were in favor of the existing form of government, then the board of aldermen shall dismiss the petition, in which case no similar petition shall be filed for a period of one year from the date of such order, but nothing short of such election shall preclude the filing of the petition at any time.

Any city which shall have operated for more than two years under the council form of government may abandon such form of government and return to the code charter form of government by substantially the same procedure through petitions and elections as herein provided for change to the council form of government. Such change, however, shall take effect on the first Monday of January following the expiration of the term of office of the members of the council then holding office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 8.

§ 21-7-7.
Members of the council; their election and compensation.

The governing body of any such municipality shall be a council, known and designated as such, consisting of seven members. One of the members shall be the mayor, having the qualifications as prescribed by Section 21-3-9, who shall have full rights, powers and privileges of other councilmen. The mayor shall be nominated and elected at large; the remaining councilmen shall be nominated and elected one from each ward into which the city shall be divided. However, if the city be divided into less than six wards, the remaining councilmen shall be nominated and elected at large. The councilmen, including the mayor, shall be elected for a term of four years to serve until their successors are elected and qualified in accordance with the provisions of Section 21-11-7, said term commencing on the first Monday of January after the municipal election first following the adoption of the form of government as provided by this chapter.

The compensation for the members of the council shall, for the first four years of operation, under this chapter, be fixed by the board of mayor and aldermen holding office prior to the change in form of government. Thereafter the amount of compensation for each such member may be increased or decreased by the council, by council action taken prior to the election of members thereof for the ensuing term, such action to become effective with the ensuing terms.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 3.

§ 21-7-9.
Meetings of council; quorum; voting.

Regular public meetings of the council shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in January after the election of the members of the council and monthly thereafter on the first Tuesday in each month. When a regular meeting of the council shall fall upon a holiday, the council shall meet the following day. Special meetings may be called at any time by the mayor or by three (3) members of the council. At any and all meetings of the council, five (5) members thereof shall constitute a quorum. The quorum required by this section may be established by teleconference or video means as provided in Section 25-41-5(2). The affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the quorum at any meeting shall be necessary to adopt any motion, resolution, or ordinance or to pass any measure whatever unless otherwise provided in this chapter. Upon every vote taken by the council the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded and every motion, resolution, or ordinance shall be reduced to writing before the vote is taken thereon. Upon request of one or more council members, any motion, resolution or ordinance shall be read by the clerk before the vote is taken thereon.

The council may, pursuant to Section 21-17-17, set a day other than Tuesday for the holding of its regular monthly meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 4; Laws, 1973, ch. 324, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 403, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 503, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 442, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 319, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-7-11.
Powers of council; surety bond of officers and employees.

The full and complete executive and legislative powers of the municipality as vested by law, or inherent, shall be vested in such council. The council, however, may delegate such of its administrative functions as it deems proper and necessary to such officials so elected by it as provided in Section 21-7-15, and in addition may delegate administrative powers and functions to such other person or persons as may be selected by said council in order to carry out its functions, whether municipal or proprietary, which would permit the efficient administration of its municipal affairs. Said council has the right to select, appoint or designate departmental heads, such as but not limited to superintendent of utilities, superintendent of public health and sanitation, superintendent of fire and safety, superintendent of parks and recreation, superintendent of public buildings and grounds, and such other departmental heads as the council may deem best and proper. Said council has the power to fix the compensation of all such persons so selected and to define their duties, obligations and responsibilities. The council shall also require all officers and employees handling or having the custody of any public funds of such city to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in an amount to be determined by the council (which shall not be less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00)). Any and all such persons so selected shall be accountable to the council and shall make report, or reports, to the council so often as is required of them respectively, and may be removed at any time for cause after first having been given an opportunity for a hearing on the reasons for removal. No member of the council shall be eligible for selection to any such office or position.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 382 § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 24; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1988).

§ 21-7-13.
Powers and duties of mayor.

The powers and duties heretofore conferred upon the mayor of municipalities by law are hereby conferred upon and charged to the council. The mayor, or in his absence the vice-mayor, shall (a) as chairman preside at all meetings of the council, and shall have veto power, in writing, giving his reasons therefor, of any measure passed by the council, although a measure vetoed may be adopted notwithstanding, if two-thirds of the council vote therefor; (b) represent the municipality in all functions political, social or economic, but he shall in no wise bind the municipality, other than as he may be specifically authorized or delegated to do by the council, as reflected by its orders, resolutions or ordinances; (c) execute for and on behalf of the council, all documents or instruments of writing, of whatever kind and character, under the seal of the municipality, when necessary or required; and (d) act for the municipality as directed by the council, in any manner and for any purpose which by any statute or law, because of its particular wording or meaning, provides for individual action of the mayor rather than body action of the council, wherein and whereby such right of action could not be properly or consistently exercised by the latter, all to the end that any such municipality coming under the provisions of this chapter shall not be denied any of the rights and privileges which any such municipality would enjoy except for the provisions of this chapter. The council shall fix the amount of compensation of the mayor and vice-mayor, for their additional duties as such, which compensation shall be in addition to their compensation as councilmen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 5.

§ 21-7-15.
Election of vice-mayor and other officers; duties.

The members of the council shall from their membership elect a vice-mayor who shall have the powers and duties as prescribed by this chapter. The members of the council by a majority vote of its entire membership shall elect from time to time, to serve during its pleasure, persons, residents of said municipality, but not from among its membership, who shall be designated and have official status as (a) clerk, (b) one or more deputy clerks, (c) marshal, (d) street commissioner, (e) tax collector, (f) tax assessor, (g) treasurer, (h) police justice pro tempore, and (i) city attorney. The office of marshal, police justice pro tempore, and city attorney shall not be consolidated with any other office but such other designated offices may be consolidated in whole or in part. Such officials so elected shall be amenable to the council and their compensation shall be fixed by said council and each may be required to enter into such bond for the faithful discharge of their duties as the council deems necessary. Such selected officials may be removed by the council at any time for cause after first having been given an opportunity for a hearing on the reasons for removal. The duties of the clerk shall be those prescribed by Sections 21-15-17, 21-15-19, 21-23-11, and 21-39-7. The duties of the deputy clerk, or clerks, shall be those vested in the clerk, as aforesaid, but who shall act in the name of the clerk. The duties of the marshal shall be those as prescribed by Section 21-21-1. The duties of the street commissioner shall be those as prescribed by Section 21-3-23. The duties of the tax collector shall be those as prescribed by Section 21-33-53. The duties of the tax assessor shall be those applicable to such office under this title. The duties of the treasurer shall be those as prescribed by Section 21-39-19. In addition to the foregoing duties the council may confer upon such appointed officials respectively, other than to the police justice pro tempore, additional duties as the council may prescribe.

The police justice shall be nominated and elected at large and he, together with the police justice pro tempore as appointed, shall meet the qualifications as prescribed by Chapter 23 of this title, and shall perform such duties and have such powers as vested by this title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 6.

§ 21-7-17.
Existing law, rights and liabilities of city unaffected by reorganization.

All by-laws, ordinances, and resolutions lawfully passed and in force in every city heretofore operating under code charter, which changes its form of government to council form under the provisions of this chapter, shall remain in force until altered or repealed by the council elected under the provisions thereof. The territorial limits of every such city shall not be affected by the change, and all rights and property of every description, which were vested in every such city, under its former organization, shall vest in the same under the organization contemplated by council form of government, and no right or liability, either in favor or against such city, and no suit or prosecution of any kind shall be affected by such change, unless otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-09; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 9.

§ 21-7-19.
Chapter cumulative to other laws.

It is not intended by this chapter to amend or repeal any existing laws by the provisions hereof, but this chapter shall be cumulative and in addition to any laws in force.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.7-10; Laws, 1948, ch. 382, § 10.